Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.280

General penalty.

Any person who shall violate any of the provisions of chapter 18.64 RCW and for which a penalty is not provided shall be deemed guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1963 c 38 s 14; 1909 c 213 s 13; RRS s 10146. Formerly RCW 18.64.250, part.]